Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 4

Vocational Services to the Blind — Business Enterprise Program

71-4-401. Program established — Purpose.

The vocational rehabilitation service of the department of human services is authorized to establish and supervise a business enterprise program for the blind.

The purpose of this program shall be to promote the vocational rehabilitation of blind individuals and to assist them in becoming self-supporting.

Acts 1949, ch. 99, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.92 (Williams, § 4765.78a); impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-619, 14-14-301; Acts 1994, ch. 723, § 1.

Cross-References. Vending stands, title 71, ch. 4, part 5.

71-4-402. [Reserved.]

Despite any provisions to the contrary, purchases of materials, equipment, stock and merchandise for use in a business enterprise program for the blind may be made by the director of services for the blind without the necessity of taking bids for the purchases, advertisement for such bids or other restrictions governing the purchase of materials generally on behalf of the state.

Acts 1949, ch. 99, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.92 (Williams, § 4765.78c); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-621, 14-14-303.

71-4-404. Certification of disbursements and repayments.

Disbursements from and repayments to the revolving fund shall be made on the certification of the director of services for the blind.

Acts 1949, ch. 99, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.92 (Williams, § 4765.78d); impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-622, 14-14-304.

71-4-405. Rules governing disbursements — Liability for losses.

Disbursements from the revolving fund shall be made in accordance with rules and regulations recommended by the director approved by the commissioner; provided, that the director shall not be accountable for losses incurred in the making and obtaining of repayment of such advance except for losses due to the director's willful misconduct.

Acts 1949, ch. 99, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.92 (Williams, § 4765.78e); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-623, 14-14-305.